District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.24

Council approval of massage therapy regulations directed at licensed therapist facilities.

There shall be no regulation of massage therapy that is directed at regulating a licensed therapist facility without affirmative approval by the Council of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 524
as added June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 502, 60 DCR 3390
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 502 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).